Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-108
Department of Health and Human Services; institutions controlled.

The Department of Health and Human Services shall have oversight and general control of the Beatrice State Developmental Center, the hospitals for the mentally ill, such skilled nursing care and intermediate care facilities as may be established by the department, any facility operated and utilized as a youth rehabilitation and treatment center in compliance with state law, and all charitable institutions.

Laws 1913, c. 179, § 9, p. 537;

R.S.1913, § 7187;

C.S.1922, § 6838;

C.S.1929, § 83-109;

Laws 1935, c. 185, § 1, p. 685;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 83-109;

R.S.1943, § 83-108;

Laws 1949, c. 291, § 2, p. 994;

Laws 1959, c. 442, § 1, p. 1485;

Laws 1959, c. 418, § 13, p. 1405;

Laws 1959, c. 419, § 11, p. 1412;

Laws 1961, c. 416, § 14, p. 1270;

Laws 1963, c. 526, § 3, p. 1649;

Laws 1963, c. 528, § 3, p. 1656;

Laws 1969, c. 814, § 7, p. 3061;

Laws 1973, LB 563, § 20;

Laws 1973, LB 536, § 2;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 897;

Laws 1997, LB 396, § 23;

Laws 2017, LB340, § 21;

Laws 2020, LB1188, § 17.

The statutes which give the Court of Industrial Relations jurisdiction over public employees are not unconstitutional. American Fed. of S., C. & M. Emp. v. Department of Public Institutions, 195 Neb. 253, 237 N.W.2d 841 (1976).